Maryland, session 2026, HB0411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–217.
(a) (1) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual
may elect to use the standard deduction to compute Maryland taxable income whether or
not the individual itemizes deductions on the individual’s federal income tax return in
determining federal taxable income.
(ii) If an individual elects to use the standard deduction on the
federal income tax return, the individual may not take any itemized deduction in § 10–218
of this subtitle.
(2) A fiduciary may not use the standard deduction.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0411*

HOUSE BILL 411
(b) (1) For an individual other than one described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of
this subsection, the standard deduction is [$3,350] $4,100.
(2) For an individual described in § 2 of the Internal Revenue Code as a
head of household or as a surviving spouse, the standard deduction is [$6,700] $8,200.
(3) For spouses on a joint return, the standard deduction is [$6,700]
$8,200.
(c) (1) For each taxable year beginning after December 31, [2025] 2026, the
standard deduction amount specified in subsection (b) of this section shall be increased by
an amount equal to the product of multiplying the standard deduction amount by the
cost–of–living adjustment specified in this subsection.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the cost–of–living adjustment is the
cost–of–living adjustment within the meaning of § 1(f)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for
the calendar year in which a taxable year begins, as determined by the Comptroller, by
substituting “calendar year [2024”] 2025” for “calendar year 2016” in § 1(f)(3)(A) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(3) If any increase determined under paragraph (1) of this subsection is not
a multiple of $50, the increase shall be rounded down to the next lowest multiple of $50.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.